Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.010

Intent.

The legislature intends to create the office of state legislative labor relations for the purposes of considering and managing the unique issues raised by legislative collective bargaining. By examining issues set forth in RCW 44.90.030, the office will provide the legislature with a fuller understanding of how the legislature as an employer can best implement legislation for collective bargaining for legislative employees, which would be administered by the public employment relations commission.

[ 2022 c 283 s 1.]